Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-16] Hawaii community development
revolving fund. There is created the Hawaii community development
revolving fund into which all receipts and revenues of the authority shall be
deposited. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for the purposes of this
chapter. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next